Illinois, session 104th, SB1199.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12-7.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-7.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 12-7.1)7    Sec. 12-7.1. Hate crime. 8    (a) A person commits hate crime when, by reason of the 9actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, 10gender, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, 11citizenship, immigration status, or national origin of another 12individual or group of individuals, or by reason of the actual 13or perceived employment as a peace officer or status as a 14retired peace officer, regardless of the existence of any 15other motivating factor or factors, he or she commits assault, 16battery, aggravated assault, intimidation, stalking, 17cyberstalking, misdemeanor theft, criminal trespass to 18residence, misdemeanor criminal damage to property, criminal 19trespass to vehicle, criminal trespass to real property, mob 20action, disorderly conduct, transmission of obscene messages, 21harassment by telephone, or harassment through electronic 22communications as these crimes are defined in Sections 12-1, 2312-2, 12-3(a), 12-7.3, 12-7.5, 16-1, 19-4, 21-1, 21-2, 21-3,   SB1199- 2 -LRB104 03903 RLC 13927 b125-1, 26-1, 26.5-1, 26.5-2, paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2), and 2(a)(3) of Section 12-6, and paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(5) of 3Section 26.5-3 of this Code, respectively.4    (b) Except as provided in subsection (b-5), hate crime is 5a Class 4 felony for a first offense and a Class 2 felony for a 6second or subsequent offense.7    (b-5) Hate crime is a Class 3 felony for a first offense 8and a Class 2 felony for a second or subsequent offense if 9committed:10        (1) in, or upon the exterior or grounds of, a church, 11    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 12    identified or associated with a particular religion or 13    used for religious worship or other religious purpose;14        (2) in a cemetery, mortuary, or other facility used 15    for the purpose of burial or memorializing the dead;16        (3) in a school or other educational facility, 17    including an administrative facility or public or private 18    dormitory facility of or associated with the school or 19    other educational facility;20        (4) in a public park or an ethnic or religious 21    community center;22        (5) on the real property comprising any location 23    specified in clauses (1) through (4) of this subsection 24    (b-5); or25        (6) on a public way within 1,000 feet of the real 26    property comprising any location specified in clauses (1)   SB1199- 3 -LRB104 03903 RLC 13927 b1    through (4) of this subsection (b-5).2    (b-10) Upon imposition of any sentence, the trial court 3shall also either order restitution paid to the victim or 4impose a fine in an amount to be determined by the court based 5on the severity of the crime and the injury or damages suffered 6by the victim. In addition, any order of probation or 7conditional discharge entered following a conviction or an 8adjudication of delinquency shall include a condition that the 9offender perform public or community service of no less than 10200 hours if that service is established in the county where 11the offender was convicted of hate crime. In addition, any 12order of probation or conditional discharge entered following 13a conviction or an adjudication of delinquency shall include a 14condition that the offender enroll in an educational program 15discouraging hate crimes involving the protected class 16identified in subsection (a) that gave rise to the offense the 17offender committed. The educational program must be attended 18by the offender in-person and may be administered, as 19determined by the court, by a university, college, community 20college, non-profit organization, the Illinois Holocaust and 21Genocide Commission, or any other organization that provides 22educational programs discouraging hate crimes, except that 23programs administered online or that can otherwise be attended 24remotely are prohibited. The court may also impose any other 25condition of probation or conditional discharge under this 26Section. If the court sentences the offender to imprisonment   SB1199- 4 -LRB104 03903 RLC 13927 b1or periodic imprisonment for a violation of this Section, as a 2condition of the offender's mandatory supervised release, the 3court shall require that the offender perform public or 4community service of no less than 200 hours and enroll in an 5educational program discouraging hate crimes involving the 6protected class identified in subsection (a) that gave rise to 7the offense the offender committed. 8    (c) Independent of any criminal prosecution or the result 9of a criminal prosecution, any person suffering injury to his 10or her person, damage to his or her property, intimidation as 11defined in paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(3) of Section 1212-6 of this Code, stalking as defined in Section 12-7.3 of 13this Code, cyberstalking as defined in Section 12-7.5 of this 14Code, disorderly conduct as defined in paragraph (a)(1), 15(a)(4), (a)(5), or (a)(6) of Section 26-1 of this Code, 16transmission of obscene messages as defined in Section 26.5-1 17of this Code, harassment by telephone as defined in Section 1826.5-2 of this Code, or harassment through electronic 19communications as defined in paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(5) of 20Section 26.5-3 of this Code as a result of a hate crime may 21bring a civil action for damages, injunction or other 22appropriate relief. The court may award actual damages, 23including damages for emotional distress, as well as punitive 24damages. The court may impose a civil penalty up to $25,000 for 25each violation of this subsection (c). A judgment in favor of a 26person who brings a civil action under this subsection (c)   SB1199- 5 -LRB104 03903 RLC 13927 b1shall include attorney's fees and costs. After consulting with 2the local State's Attorney, the Attorney General may bring a 3civil action in the name of the People of the State for an 4injunction or other equitable relief under this subsection 5(c). In addition, the Attorney General may request and the 6court may impose a civil penalty up to $25,000 for each 7violation under this subsection (c). The parents or legal 8guardians, other than guardians appointed pursuant to the 9Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, of an 10unemancipated minor shall be liable for the amount of any 11judgment for all damages rendered against such minor under 12this subsection (c) in any amount not exceeding the amount 13provided under Section 5 of the Parental Responsibility Law.14    (d) "Sexual orientation" has the meaning ascribed to it in 15paragraph (O-1) of Section 1-103 of the Illinois Human Rights 16Act.17(Source: P.A. 102-235, eff. 1-1-22; 102-468, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 201, 2026.